Hawaii, session 2026, SB2798.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII: SECTION 1.  Section 353C-16, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is amended by amending its title and subsections (a) and (b) to read as follows: "[[]§353C-16[]]  Agricultural enforcement [pilot] program.  (a)  There shall be established within the department an agricultural enforcement [pilot] program [on the islands of Oahu and Hawaii,] in the State to be implemented at the discretion of the deputy director of law enforcement.  The department shall employ or appoint, and remove, the following persons, subject to chapter 76 and section 78-1: (1)  An assistant chief, who shall be the administrator of the agricultural enforcement [pilot] program and shall have charge, direction, and control, subject to the direction or control of the deputy director, of all matters relating to the enforcement of an offense listed in section 708-835.55 involving theft of an agricultural product or commodity and any other matters as determined by the deputy director.  The assistant chief shall be an administrator experienced in addressing agricultural theft; and (2)  Personnel, state law enforcement officers, and investigators, including but not limited to state law enforcement officers serving on a voluntary basis without pay. (b)  In addition to all police powers and duties, state law enforcement officers in the agricultural enforcement [pilot] program shall: (1)  Focus on offenses under sections 708-830.5, 708-831, 708-832, and 708-833 that involve the theft of an agricultural product or commodity; (2)  Gather evidence, conduct investigations, and conduct field observations, as required or assigned; (3)  Cooperate with any enforcement authorities of the federal, state, or county government in the development of programs and mutual aid agreements for agricultural activities within the State; and (4)  Carry out other duties and responsibilities as determined by the deputy director." SECTION 2. Act 235, Session Laws of Hawaii 2025, is amended by amending section 47 to read as follows: "SECTION 47.  This Act shall take effect on July 1, 2025[; provided that part II of this Act shall be repealed on July 1, 2028]." SECTION 3. Statutory material to be repealed is bracketed and stricken.  New statutory material is underscored. SECTION 4. This Act shall take effect upon its approval. INTRODUCED BY: _____________________________